Nebraska, session 109, LB485.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB485 LB485
2025 2025
Section 1. (1) The personal identifying information of train crew
members contained in reports involving railroad fatalities and contained
in communications between law enforcement and train crew members involved
in such railroad fatalities shall be:
(a) Redacted from any public reports; and
(b) Maintained by law enforcement and any persons described in
subsection (2) of this section, that are in possession of the reports and
communications, in a manner that ensures the confidentiality of the
personal identifying information of the train crew members.
(2) Unredacted copies of the reports and communications shall be
accessible at all reasonable times:
(a) To the host or employing railroad;
(b) To any person authorized to access such copies by court order
and to any person specifically authorized by court order to obtain
information if access to the copies is necessary for the performance of
such person's duties; and
(c) To any law enforcement officer, prosecutor, or Public Service
Commission staff if access to the reports and communications is necessary
for the performance of such person's duties.
(3) A train crew member is not required to display an operator's
license to any law enforcement officer in connection with the operation
of a locomotive or train within this state.
(4) For purposes of this section, train crew member means an
engineer, conductor, brakeman, or any other member of the crew of a
locomotive or train being operated upon rails, including operation on a
railroad crossing over a public street, road, or highway.
-2-